pt-PT: Ajuste da t-shirt: Atlético; Corte quadrado; Tamanho grande; Plus; Normal; Descontraído; Slim; Alto; Outro
tr: Tişört kesimi: Atletik; Kutu kesim; Oversize; Büyük beden; Normal; Rahat; Dar; Uzun; Diğer
vi: Kiểu áo thun: Vừa vặn thể thao; Form vuông (Boxy); Form rộng (Oversized); Cỡ lớn (Plus); Vừa vặn (Regular); Form suông (Relaxed); Ôm sát (Slim); Dáng cao (Tall); Khác
ko: 티셔츠 핏: 애슬레틱; 박시; 오버사이즈; 플러스; 레귤러; 릴랙스; 슬림; 톨; 기타
pl: Dopasowanie koszulki: Sportowy; Pudełkowy; Oversize; Plus size; Regularny; Luźny; Slim; Przedłużany (Tall); Inny
th: ทรงเสื้อยืด: ทรงแอทเลติก; ทรงกล่อง; ทรงโอเวอร์ไซส์; พลัสไซส์; ทรงเรกูลาร์; ทรงหลวม; ทรงสลิม; ทรงยาว; อื่นๆ
da: Pasform for T-shirt: Atletisk; Boxy; Oversized; Plus; Almindelig; Afslappet; Slim; Høj; Andet
lt-LT: Marškinėlių kirpimas: Sportinio kirpimo; Kvadratinio kirpimo; Padidintas („oversized“); Plius dydis („Plus“); Standartinis („Regular“); Laisvas („Relaxed“); Prigludęs („Slim“); Pailgintas („Tall“); Kita
zh-CN: T恤版型: 运动款; 宽松短款; 超大款; 大码; 常规款; 休闲款; 修身款; 加长款; 其他
fi: T-paidan istuvuus: Urheilullinen; Laatikkomainen; Ylisuuri; Plus-koko; Normaali; Rento; Slim; Pitkä; Muu
sl-SI: Prileganje majice s kratkimi rokavi: Atletski kroj; Kvadratni kroj; Predimenzioniran kroj (oversized); Večje velikosti (Plus); Standardni kroj; Ohlapen kroj; Teliran kroj; Podaljšan kroj; Drugo
hr-HR: Kroj majice kratkih rukava: Sportski kroj; Kvadratni kroj; Široki kroj (oversized); Plus; Standardni kroj; Opušteni kroj; Uski kroj; Za visoke; Ostalo
en: T-shirt fit: Athletic; Boxy; Oversized; Plus; Regular; Relaxed; Slim; Tall; Other
ro-RO: Croiala tricoului: Sport; Pătrățos; Supradimensionat; Plus; Standard; Relaxat; Slim; Înalt; Altele
cs: Střih trička: Atletický; Hranatý; Oversized; Plus size; Běžný; Volný; Úzký; Prodloužený; Jiné
es: Ajuste de la camiseta: Atlético; Boxy; Extragrande; Plus; Regular; Relajado; Ajustado; Alto; Otro
ru: Посадка футболки: Спортивный крой; Квадратный; Оверсайз; Плюс-сайз; Стандартный; Свободный; Облегающий; Для высоких; Другое
sv: T-shirt – passform: Atletisk; Boxig; Oversized; Plus; Normal; Avslappnad; Smal; Lång; Annan
zh-TW: T 恤版型: 運動版; 方正版型; Oversize 寬鬆版; 大尺碼; 一般版; 休閒寬鬆版; 修身版; 加長版; 其他
ja: Tシャツフィット: アスレチック; ボクシー; オーバーサイズ; プラス; レギュラー; リラックス; スリム; トール; その他
nb: T-skjorte-passform: Atletisk; Kasseformet; Oversized; Plus; Normal; Avslappet; Slim; Høy; Annet
sk-SK: Strih trička: Atletický; Hranatý; Voľný (oversized); Nadmerný; Bežný; Voľnejší; Zúžený; Predĺžený; Iný
el: Εφαρμογή σε μπλουζάκι: Αθλητική; Τετράγωνη; Oversized; Plus; Κανονική; Χαλαρή; Στενή; Tall; Άλλη
nl: T-shirt pasvorm: Sportief; Boxy; Oversized; Plus; Regular; Relaxed; Slim; Lang; Overig
hu: Pólófazon: Sportos; Szögletes; Oversize; Plus size; Normál; Laza; Szűkített; Magas; Egyéb
bg-BG: Кройка на тениска: Спортна; Широка и квадратна; Оувърсайз; Макси размер; Стандартна; Свободна; Вталена; Удължена; Друго
pt-BR: Camiseta ajuste: Atlético; Quadrado; Oversized; Plus; Padrão; Descontraído; Justo; Alto; Outro
fr: Coupe du t-shirt: Athlétique; Boxy; Oversize; Grande taille; Standard; Décontractée; Ajustée; Grande (longueur); Autre
it: Vestibilità della t-shirt: Sportiva; Squadrata; Oversize; Taglie forti; Regolare; Comoda; Aderente; Taglie lunghe; Altro
de: Passform des T-Shirts: Athletisch; Kastig; Oversized; Plus Size; Normal; Locker; Schmal; Langgröße; Sonstige